Washington statutes.
RCW 11.28.150

Revocation of letters by discovery of will.

If after letters of administration are granted a will of the deceased be found and probate thereof be granted, the letters shall be revoked and letters testamentary or of administration with the will annexed, shall be granted.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.28.150. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 51; RRS s 1421; prior: Code 1881 s 1375; 1863 p 218 s 109; 1860 p 180 s 76.]